Maryland, session 2025, SB0344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–275.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0344*

SENATE BILL 344
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISCOUNT STORE” MEANS A RETAIL STORE THAT OFFERS FOR
SALE:
(I) A COMBINATION AND VARIETY OF CONVENIENCE AND
CONSUMER SHOPPING GOODS; AND
(II) THE MAJORITY OF THE ITEMS IN THE INVENTORY AT A
PRICE NOT TO EXCEED $5.
(3) “RETAIL USE” DOES NOT INCLUDE USE AS A DISCOUNT STORE OR
A SELF–SERVICE STORAGE FACILITY.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT A PROPERTY TAX
CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION BE GRANTED PRIMARILY TO DEFRAY
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE REMOVAL OF UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANKS AND
THE REMEDIATION OF ANY CONTAMINATION ASSOCIATED WITH UNDERGROUND
STORAGE TANKS.
(C) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY GRANT, BY LAW,
A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION AGAINST THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON REAL PROPERTY IF THE USE
OF THE REAL PROPERTY HAS BEEN CONVERTED FROM A RETAIL SERVICE STATION
TO ANOTHER RETAIL USE, A RESIDENTIAL USE, OR A MIXED RETAIL AND
RESIDENTIAL USE.
(D) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY PROVIDE, BY
LAW, FOR:
(1) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION;
(2) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT;
(3) REGULATIONS AND PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND
UNIFORM PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE TAX CREDIT; AND
(4) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 344 3
(E) AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET, THE STATE SHALL THE STATE
MAY PAY TO EACH COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT GRANTS THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 50% OF THE PROPERTY TAX
REVENUE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN COLLECTED IF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION HAD NOT BEEN GRANTED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.